Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.109

Overseas voter.

"Overseas voter" means any elector of the state of Washington outside the territorial limits of the United States.

[ 2009 c 369 s 2; 2003 c 111 s 119. Prior: 1987 c 346 s 6. Formerly RCW 29.01.117.]

NOTES:

Legislative intent—Effective date—1987 c 346: See notes following RCW 29A.40.010.